Alaska, session 34, HB359.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 05 * Section 1. AS 29.10.200 is amended by adding a new paragraph to read: 06 (68) AS 29.35.142 (regulation of pesticides). 07 * Sec. 2. AS 29.35 is amended by adding a new section to read: 08 Sec. 29.35.142. Regulation of pesticides. (a) The authority to regulate 09 pesticides is reserved to the state. A municipality may not enact or enforce an 10 ordinance, rule, or order regulating 11 (1) the sale, use, registration, notification of use, advertising and 12 marketing, distribution, storage, transportation, or disposal of a pesticide; 13 (2) applicator training on and certification for the use of a pesticide; 14 (3) disclosure of confidential information relating to a pesticide; or 01 (4) competition in the pesticide market. 02 (b) This section applies to home rule and general law municipalities. 03 (c) In this section, "pesticide" has the meaning given in AS 46.03.900. 04 * Sec. 3. This Act takes effect immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.